Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-218
Prize promotion, defined.

Prize promotion means (1) a sweepstakes or other game of chance or (2) an oral or written express or implied representation that a person has won, has been selected to receive, or may be eligible to receive a prize or purported prize.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 80.